Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1479.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6102(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 6102. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Post." To share, display, provide, upload, transmit, publish, distribute, communicate or circulate content on a social media platform.* * *<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 "Social media platform." A public or semipublic Internet-based service or application that meets all of the following criteria:(1) A substantial function of the platform, service or application is to connect users in order to allow users to interact socially with each other within the service or application, provided that a platform, service or application that provides email or direct messaging services or cloud computing shall not be considered to meet this criterion solely on the basis of that function.(2) The platform, service or application allows users to do all of the following:(i) Construct a public or semipublic profile for purposes of signing into and using the platform, service or application.(ii) Populate a list of other users with whom an individual shares a social connection within the system.(iii) Create or post content viewable by other users, including on message boards, in chat rooms or through a landing page or main feed that presents the user with content generated by other users."User." A person who posts content on a social media platform.* * *Section 2. Section 6108(a)(1) of Title 23 is amended to read:SECTION 2. SECTION 6108(A) OF TITLE 23 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:§ 6108. Relief.(a) General rule.--Subject to subsection (a.1), the court 20250HB1479PN2593 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may grant any protection order or approve any consent agreement to bring about a cessation of abuse of the plaintiff or minor children. The order or agreement may include:(1) Directing the defendant to refrain from abusing the plaintiff or minor children[.], including:(i) prohibiting the defendant from accessing or utilizing social media platforms; or(ii) prohibiting the defendant from posting on social media platforms.* * *(9.2) PROHIBITING THE DEFENDANT FROM ACCESSING, UTILIZING OR POSTING ON SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS.* * *SECTION 3. SECTION 62A03 OF TITLE 42 IS AMENDED BY ADDING DEFINITIONS TO READ:§ 62A03. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"POST." AS DEFINED IN 23 PA.C.S. § 6102 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS).* * *"SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM." AS DEFINED IN 23 PA.C.S. § 6102."USER." AS DEFINED IN 23 PA.C.S. § 6102.* * *SECTION 4. SECTION 62A07(B)(1) OF TITLE 42 IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 62A07. RELIEF.* * *20250HB1479PN2593 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) GENERAL RULE.--AN ORDER OR A CONSENT AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE:(1) [PROHIBITING THE DEFENDANT FROM HAVING ANY CONTACT WITH THE VICTIM, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, RESTRAINING THE DEFENDANT FROM ENTERING THE VICTIM'S RESIDENCE, PLACE OF EMPLOYMENT, BUSINESS OR SCHOOL. THIS MAY INCLUDE PROHIBITING INDIRECT CONTACT THROUGH THIRD PARTIES AND ALSO PROHIBITING DIRECT OR INDIRECT CONTACT WITH OTHER DESIGNATED PERSONS.] PROHIBITING THE DEFENDANT FROM HAVING ANY CONTACT WITH THE VICTIM, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) RESTRAINING THE DEFENDANT FROM ENTERING THE VICTIM'S RESIDENCE, PLACE OF EMPLOYMENT, BUSINESS OR SCHOOL.(II) PROHIBITING INDIRECT CONTACT THROUGH THIRD PARTIES AND PROHIBITING DIRECT OR INDIRECT CONTACT WITH OTHER DESIGNATED PERSONS.(III) PROHIBITING THE DEFENDANT FROM ACCESSING, UTILIZING OR POSTING ON SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORMS.* * *Section 3 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1479PN2593 - 4 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920